Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Number of Reviews
27

Author
Matthew Brissette
Watching Lethal Weapon 4 is a bit like spending two hours with friends
you have not seen in a while. In 
fact  , the producers should have released this movie on the fourth of
July. Why? Because you do the same things you would during an
independence day party with family: chat about old times , complain
about the clock gaining on you and trash a few things after having too
much to drink. To me , and perhaps many others of my generation , Riggs
and Murtaugh are like old pals that we grew up with. 
There are many franchises in Hollywood but the Lethal Weapon series is
the one I grew up on. So I hope you will forgive this reviewer for not
being as impartial as he should be. I was not there for the birth of the
Bond franchise , Friday the 13th or Freddy franchises but I was
definately there for the first Lethal Weapon. Thus , when you consider
all the movies that I want to see at the top of the box office this
summer...I guess you could say LW4 my sentimental favorite. 
I'd like to start of this review by saying that you should not let the
trailers fool you. The scene , you know which one I mean , that you have
all seen a dozen times in the trailers caught me off guard. I had seen
it many times and , quite frankly , it was starting to bore me. Let me
tell you , what you see in the promos is only half of this scene. There
is even more to the explosion that what you might think. 
With that out of the way , LW4 is the second best movie I have seen this
summer. Mind you , number one is The Truman Show and that is hard to
beat. The X-Files is third on my list. I have a feeling The Mask of
Zorro is the only real threat to this list's order. Anyway , LW4 is not
the best in the series , it's not even second best. It's not as bad as
three ( which was still pretty damn good , mind you ) but not as good as
two. 
What really restrains this movie from becoming great is the plot. We all
know that LW4 was rushed through production to fill the void left by
Superman this summer , so it's kind of hard to know who to blame for
this. Don't worry too much , the movie's story is still good , better
than I expected after reading so many bad reviews , but it lacks the
edge of the previous installments and sometimes takes the easy way out.
The bad guy this time is Jet Li. Wanna know why he's called Jet? Cause
he moves at Mach 5 , that's why! And for somebody who as never played a
bad guy , well , he's pretty darn scary at times. ( Major spoilers
follow , look away if you do not want to know , something wicked this
way comes...boogie boogie boogie!...sorry...)
However , the problem with such good and nearly invincible bad guys (
hell , even our heroes say they can't beat him ) is that filmakers will
almost always kill them is the cheapest possible way. Just before the
final confrontation between our heroes and Jet , Riggs and Murtaugh
actually think that maybe they should just walk away from this one. ( I
know , I know...it does not sound like them but wait until you have seen
the movie and it will all make sense ) 
So , at the last possible moment and after and lengthy ass whupping ,
Mel Gibson just happens to find a fallen machine gun and proceeds to
fill our bad guy full of lead. Can anybody say cheap? Luckily , the just
mentioned ass whupping makes up for this lackluster ending. Ever feel
like the Lethal Weapon series as gone soft? That it's not as violent as
the first two flicks? Fear not , this three way battle makes up for all
of it. 
Before we get to some major praise , I must mention the only other thing
that bothered me about LW4. I believe it is called Mortal Kombat
syndrome , in other words: too many characters too fast. Chris Rock's
role is so damn small that I really do not understand what his name is
doing next to the real stars. He is there for less than ten minutes ,
never really does anything , never really says anything except for one
funny scene with Joe Pesci...heck , they could have cast an unknown and
it would not have made much of a difference.
Rene Russo is fine and her presence never really bothered me , however ,
in this one she becomes a useless sub-plot instead of the ass kicking
broad we came to love in LW3. Joe Pesci , while laugh out loud funny ,
is given wayyyyy too much screen time. I went to see the boys , Riggs
and Murtaugh. 
All this aside , LW4 is the funniest of the LW series. If you have not
seen the previous ones you will miss several insider jokes. The end
credits are the most orginal thing I have seen in a while , instead of
the usual scrolling credits we get a photo album filled with pictures of
the cast and crew. While quite nice , it felt too much like a goodbye
rather than an ending and got me thinking that this could really be the
last LW. 
The action scenes are quite spectacular and never did I feel the need to
scream out "Oh come on!!!!" because this is Riggs and Murtaugh and we
expect these kinds of things from them. Anybody walking in expecting the
opposite will hate this movie. It's not as over the top as , say ,
Armageddon. Armageddon was one big stunt while LW4 as to make the most
of several smaller stunts. 
All in all , Mel and Danny were born to work together , Pesci is still
funny as Leo "okay okay okay" Gets , Chris Rock is the living definition
of redundant , Rene Russo is just there for the ride and Jet Li rules
whenever he is on screen. 
Rating: 4 stars out of five for the chance to hang out with the boys one
more ( last? ) time , a weak script , the best villain of the year ( the
iceberg does not count ) , the chance to play Where in the movie is
Chris
Rock? and the best fight scene in recent memory.

Author
Tim Voon
Director: Richard Donner
Writer: Channing Gibson, story by Jonathan Lemkin
Cast: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock, Jet
Li
It's difficult to express my disappointment at seeing an unsatisfying
conclusion, to what would otherwise be considered a well made trilogy.
The spark has just left Lethal Weapon 4, as surely as the lights dim
before it's opening.
There are certain annoying tendencies that have cropped up in this
movie, which was not obvious in its predecessors. It has to do with age
and maturity, and unfortunately both Mel Gibson and Danny Glover are
getting too old to be still yelling and screaming like kids. In fact the
majority of their dialogue is so anxious, frenzied and manic  you
probably won't understand what they're shouting about! Add Joe Peschi to
the screeching and the noise has just become deafening. Not so funny
anymore, poor Peschi gets the brunt of most of the childish antics of
the two most immature Captains on the police force. Add Chris Rock to
the trio and well, we have an avalanche of hyperactivity and mayhem.
Rock tries to out-talk Peschi at every turn and Peschi responds by
yelling louder. In fact all sanity is loss from the word go as the movie
plummets into tedious routines of smart-arse cops trying to outdo each
other.
Fortunately, Renne Russo isn't as manic as the others and retains the
sanity and sanctity of a pregnant woman. The other commendable character
is Jet Li - the martial arts world wonder boy, who doesn't have to shout
to be heard. His stoic looks and staunch Mandarin dialogue, captures
more meaning and heart than the combined clown fest of Gibson, Peschi,
Rock and Glover put together. Not to mention the fact that Li could
probably have kicked their butts majorly bad in a fair fight, but
because he's the villain, ends up dead.
This was one movie where, I wanted the bad guy Li to win and give all
four clowns a good thumping for making too much noise. The stunts are
pretty average for this sort of action thriller  there are no
meteorites, tidal waves or giant monsters stomping through the streets
of this movie. Very disappointing overall, for what was otherwise an
intelligent, witty action duo.

Author
Steve Kong
Lethal Weapon 4 is like a ten year high school reunion, or at least what
I've heard about them everyone is older and overweight But, the good thing
is the familiarity with everyone and Lethal Weapon 4 has familiarity. From
the director, Richard Donner, who directed all four films, to most of the
actors, everything old is new in Lethal Weapon 4.
Lethal Weapon 4 is more like the third film than the first two. The first
two had substance that accompanied the action. For instance, in the first
movie, there was a genuine character development scene -- Rigg's first
dinner at the Murtaugh house. The second matched the first, an action film
with substance. The third, though, was a straightforward action movie.
Many didn't like the third, and I rank it last also, although it was fun.
Lethal Weapon 4 is also just about action, with no real character
development and no substance.
What makes the Lethal Weapon films so popular is what looks at first to be
a cliched but later turns to be original, relationship between Murtaugh and
Riggs. Danny Glover and Mel Gibson are perfectly cast in the respective
roles. The relationship between Murtaugh and Riggs is reduced to a bunch of
onscreen quips and onliners staring with the third film. In the first two,
the humor came from the situations, while the third and now fourth rely
mostly on oneliners to get laughs. With this in mind, the big draw for the
"new" Lethal Weapon, starting with Lethal Weapon 3, franchise is action.
And with Lethal Weapon 4 director Richard Donner does not disappoint.
If you liked the first two and thought the third was complete action fluff,
than you might not enjoy this fourth installment. However, if you go see
Lethal Weapon 4 strictly for action you will walk out happy. The best
action scenes are those in which we get to see the restrained Jet Li. But
also watch for the scene with Gibson that uses a big rig, a long piece of
plastic, and a table.
Jet Li , like Jackie Chan and Chow Yun-Fat, is a world renowned action star
-- except in the US. Lethal Weapon 4 marks his introduction to the
Hollywood movie market. And what an introduction it is. Li is a kick-butt
martial artist who has better moves than Jackie and as much film coolness
as Chow. His martial arts scenes feel restrained, though. He can beat the
living daylights out of both Gibson and Glover with just his pinky, but
he's held back because he's the bad guy.
Gibson and Glover are back doing Riggs and Murtaugh. Neither are doing much
new, but that's what I expected. Among the returning players are Renee
Russo and Joe Pesci. Russo is, next to Li, the best thing in this movie,
bringing a freshness to her role. Pesci should win some award for most
annoying performance this year. OK, OK, OK? The newcomer is Chris Rock and
he brings some freshness to this aging series.
But let's get to the most important thing the action. The action is
incredible. First, as I mentioned before, Jet Li is a very cool addition.
But, Donner has a natural eye for action and he has a bunch of standout
sequences in the film. Lethal Weapon 4 is not a deep, though provoking
movie it's an action fluff movie.
Ultimately, there will be Lethal Weapon 1 and 2 lovers who will disregard
Lethal Weapon 4 as a rushed-for-the-money sequel, but it is also a fun
film. There are three things to see Lethal Weapon 4 for first is the
amazing Jet Li. He brought "oohs" and "ahhs" to the audience I saw the film
with. Second is Renee Russo, who is just cool. And third is the action.
There are action sequences in Lethal Weapon 4 that are memorable. Lethal
Weapon 4 gets a big recommendation from me. This is action-fluff at its best.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        I don't know if there's ever been any fourth installment of a 
movie series that's been truly worth watching (um, BATMAN AND 
ROBIN?), and from the beginning it's obvious that LETHAL WEAPON 4 
won't improve upon its predecessors. It's a disappointment, too, 
because the first three movies in the series were good, sometimes great 
action comedies. This one only reinforces the theory that two decent 
sequels is all anyone can hope for, which doesn't bode well for the DIE 
HARD 4 that will no doubt be forced upon us in the years to come.
        That's not to say LETHAL WEAPON 4 isn't fun at times. 
Watching cops Riggs (Mel Gibson) and Murtaugh (Danny Glover) in 
action again, even if they're starting to look a little old for this kind of 
movie, is like hanging out with old friends after a long absence. It's 
good to see them again, but things aren't the way they were.
        In essence, this movie is little more than a reunion of LETHAL 
WEAPON characters. There's the loudmouth accountant-turned-P.I. (Joe 
Pesci) and the sexy karate chick (Rene Russo, also well into her forties 
now), and the familiar Murtaugh family. The movie ends in a series of 
nostalgic photo album shots from this and earlier LETHAL WEAPON 
movies, so at least it knows the main thing going for it is the 
familiarity of moviegoers.
        About the only thing new in LETHAL WEAPON 4 is Chris Rock, 
as Chris Rock. He plays Butters, a detective secretly married to 
Murtaugh's daughter. A lot of the movie's comic relief scenes revolve 
around Butters kissing up to his unknowing father-in-law, who thinks 
he's coming on to him. So there's that inevitable sitcom standby, where 
one person's confession is completely misinterpreted by the other 
person, leaving a knowing audience to chuckle. It goes back to the "I 
Love Lucy" days, and is about as recycled as Pesci's "they f*ck you 
with the cell phone" speech.
        Some of it is funny, though. I forgave some of the reused 
elements just because I loved the characters, which I think was the 
filmmakers' aim. And the movie is still pretty good because the action 
is more or less original. The traditional Opening Scene That Has 
Nothing To Do With The Plot has a psycho with a flamethrower and a 
machine gun out on a city street, torching and shooting everything in 
sight. The difference with part four is that the two leads don't seem to 
take any of the unrealistic action seriously, which spoils any illusion of 
danger. The solution to the torch guy is to have Murtaugh undress and 
flap his arms like a chicken to distract the guy, which may actually be 
too silly for a Leslie Nielson movie.
        The rest of the plot isn't much more serious. There's the 
FATHER OF THE BRIDE II gimmick of dual pregnancies, this time with 
Murtaugh's daughter ("Pleasee let the father be black") and Russo, still 
shacked up with Gibson but without marriage on the mind. The morals 
of these action movie heroes, I tell you... The crime side of things 
involves some Chinese gangsters (headed by badass fighter Jet Li, 
whose maiden name was Ski) who are smuggling illegal aliens in at 
$35,000 a head and are printing up some counterfeit money to buy 
the criminal Four Fathers. Or something like that; forgive me for not 
having a press kit to explain all these convoluted plots to me.
        Rest assured any pause for dialogue is just a momentary lull 
of action. And since LETHAL WEAPON 4's strong suit is its action, it's a 
good thing there's plenty of it. Like I said, the characters don't take it 
seriously, so there's no chance we will. Everyone's a lot more glib here 
than in the other movies in the series, and that's usually not a good 
thing. Think of how smug everyone was in HUDSON HAWK and you can 
imagine how good a LETHAL WEAPON 5 would probably be.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Author
Berge Garabedian
After swallowing a $25-million paycheck for this movie, Mel Gibson
returns as the ever-lovable cop-on-the-edge Riggs in the fourth
installment of this popular series. This one sees the addition of the
hot comic of the moment, Chris Rock, as well as a script written by
Channing Gibson, and a fourth-time around directing effort by the
ever-reliable Richard Donner.
PLOT:
Riggs and Murtaugh uncover a slavery importation business established
by the Asian Triad. They are bent on terminating this activity, and
predictably, infiltrate and harass the Chinese bad guys, while managing
to support their loved ones (Lorna in Riggs' case, and Murtaugh's
daughter in Murtaugh's) during their pregnancies. 
CRITIQUE:
Fun stuff! This sequel can be considered the funniest of them all,
while still remaining faithful to the action genre which it regenerated
back in the late-80's. All of the familiar faces are back with more of
their infamous wisecracks and loveable idiosyncrasies, while a couple
of new faces, add some needed spice to the ol' recipe. One of the
newest spices, who is playing the ultimate bad guy in this film, is Jet
Li, the latest in the crop of martial arts exports from Asia (see
Jackie "I can't get this smile of my face" Chan, and Chow Yun Fat). Jet
kicks some major ass in this movie, adds some needed intensity to some
otherwise predictable and light suspense sequences, and certainly shows
more potential than either one of the previously mentioned martial
artists in regards to his acting and chop-chop abilities.
The rest of the cast was adequate, with standout performances by Chris
Rock as the funny, new cop on the block, and some funny scenes with Joe
Pesci (although he did get on my nerves at times...I think he might've
overdid this role a bit). Gibson and Glover continue their decent work
as the good buddy cop guys, while Rene Russo is pretty much wasted in
this film, and wears too much make-up.
The plot is very thin in this movie, but the film never gets boring.
There is always something funny or action-packed going on, and despite
the lack of any extremely suspenseful moments (the resolution of the
plot is one of the worst that I have ever seen...), the movie does keep
you interested at all times (especially if you've been a fan of its
prequels), and certainly does make for an excellent conclusion to this
fine series. The martial arts sequences with Jet Li are amazing to
watch, and so is the one long car chase scene in this film, which is a
credit to director Donner, who has actually been able to innovate this
sequence despite its extreme overuse in many recent action films.
Overall, this movie works on most fronts, has some funny and
action-packed scenes, and does deliver a pretty neat bad guy in Jet Li.
So turn off the brain, warm up them nachos, and get ready for a fun
time at the movies!
Little Known Facts: 
Mel Gibson was born in New York, and moved to Australia at the age of
12. He stands 5'9, has been married to the same woman since 1980, and
has sired six children with her. Her name is Robyn Moore, and she is a
former dental nurse. Mel is also a devout, traditional Catholic, who
once shared a room with fellow actor Geoffrey Rush in College. Mel took
up acting only because his sister submitted an application behind his
back. The night before the audition, he got into a fight, and got his
face badly beaten. That accident won him the role.
Richard Donner's real name is Richard D. Schwartzberg, and was born in
NY, New York. He has also directed two other Mel Gibson movies (besides
the three previous LETHAL WEAPON films), CONSPIRACY THEORY (5/10) and
MAVERICK (6.5/10), as well as SUPERMAN (8/10), uncredited for SUPERMAN
2, and credited for THE OMEN.
Jet Li's real name is Lian Ji Li. He was born on the 26th of April,
1963, in Beijing, China. He started training at the Beijing wushu
academy at age nine (Wushu is China's national sport, largely a
performance version of various martial art styles), and won five gold
medals in the Chinese championships. His first when he was only 11. In
his teens, he was already a national coach, and before he was 20, he
had starred in his first movie: SHAOLIN TEMPLE (Shao Lin Si), which
started the 1980's kung-fu boom in mainland China. He then relocated to
Hong Kong, and became one of the biggest stars of the early 1990's
kung-fu boom.

Author
Nick Amado
Starring: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock,
Jet Li
It seems that in each of the films that have made up this series, there
has been at least one over-the-top but enjoyable action sequence. Riggs
jumping off a building handcuffed to a suicidal business man, Murtaugh
being pulled off an exploding john by his buddy, Riggs cutting the wrong
wire and blowing up a highrise.
Lethal Weapon 4 opens with Riggs and Murtaugh crouching behind a car
trying to avoid bullets being sprayed by a maniacal flame throwing one
man destruction force. You and I probably wouldn't be able to think of a
way out of a situation like that. But if Riggs were by your side, he'd
have you take off all of your clothes and cluck like a chicken so that
the perp might be distracted which would allow Riggs to fire at the fuel
pack on his back, thus blowing him into the air and sending him directly
into a gasoline tanker truck. That would probably work.
Sadly, Lethal Weapon 4 doesn't get much better after that. There are
some funny moments in the film. It is one of the few action film series
that has genuine belly-laughs and not just cheap one liners. But those
occasional chuckles can't hide a lame and uninspired plot; one in which
a ring of Chinese "bad dudes" smuggles in slave labor from China. Guns,
kung fu and counterfeit cash all manage to work their way in.
But what is more annoying in this fourth and hopefully final installment
of a once great movie franchise is the recurrance of an impending
fatherhood theme for two of the main characters. Rene Russo's sole
purpose in this film is as a breeder for Mel Gibson. The character that
she portrayed in 3, tough as nails, sarcastic and sexy is nowhere to be
found in 4. She is in a few paltry scenes and has nothing to do with the
film's crime plot. Though her character seems written in to cash in on
her popularity as an actress and her success with the previous sequel,
Joe Pesci's presence is even MORE obvious. He serves absolutely no
purpose and has forgotten how to make the character of Leo Getz
enjoyable. On top of that, throw in the always annoying Chris Rock and
some run of the mill, truly evil Chinese villians with zero personality
and you have Lethal Weapon 4.
There are some exciting action sequences that go way overboard (because
it's summertime, right?) And, when the jokes aren't busy blatantly
hitting you in the face, humerous sequences that remind you of the good
old days sneak their way in. But the bottom line here is that there is
nothing new in LW4. The characters border on obnoxious, the bad guys are
just plain bad, and the plot is inexcusably mundane.
It isn't so bad as to recommend that fans of the first 3 not go see it,
but for those that aren't Riggs and Murtaugh buffs, save your money.

Author
Matt Williams
After an absence of six years, the Lethal Weapon series delivers its
fourth installment.  However, this rushed production shows many signs of
a rushed production and overall wear.
It's been over ten years, and the ready-to-retire Roger Murtaugh (Danny
Glover) still hasn't left the police force.  Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson)
still has psychological issues over his dead wife.  But the majority of
their problems have already been solved in sequels past, and it is
obvious the writers were in a crisis over what to have them do.
So, they turned to several staple television gimmicks.  Lethal Weapon 4
is full of pointless subplots involving pregnancy, marriage, rumors and
deception... The franchise has become a soap opera for the action set!
The film brings back its most popular characters (even though it doesn't
know what to do with them).  Leo Getz (Joe Pesci) returns as an
annoyingly incompetent private eye.  And Lorna Cole (Rene Russo) returns
as Riggs' pregnant girlfriend (a sad turn from her meatier role in the
third installment).
And if coping with existing characters weren't enough, they introduce a
new young cop:  Lee Butters (Chris Rock) who, though he gets to do a
stand up routine or two, never quite fits in.
The plot, if you could call it one, involves illegal Chinese immigrants
used for slave labor.  The heavy this time around is Jet Li, in his
American film debut, and easily the best thing about this fourth entree.
Jet Li's action sequences in the film are simply spellbinding (and
really the only thing worth the price of admission).  Sure, he doesn't
have more than a paper thin character...but when the kicks start flying,
you don't really care.
There are a few other worthy action sequences.  (One highway chase scene
is entertaining...but somehow familiar.)  However, it is obvious this is
a series in decline.  None of those scenes compare with the similar
action sequences in the first two films (though a case could be made
against the third outing).
The characters are getting tired as well.  The Riggs and Murtaugh banter
just isn't quite as fresh as it was ten years ago.  Even Leo Getz has
become more shrill and irritating than humorous.
But for the martial arts, Lethal Weapon 4 would have been completely
pathetic.  Jet Li's moves may be fun to watch...but they can certainly
wait for video.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Bob Bloom

 Lethal Weapon 4 (1998) Starring Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, Joe
Pesci, Chris Rock and Jet Li. Directed by Richard Donner.
 Lethal Weapon 4 is crass, vulgar, childish, ultraviolent, profane, stupid
and appealing to the lowest common denominator of movie audiences. And yet
...
 It's hard to really hate this movie, simply because of the by-play and
chemistry of stars Mel Gibson and Danny Glover. Yea, it's the same old
shtick they've done in the other Lethal Weapon movies, but it still exudes
some magical pull that sucks you in.
 It's like going to a strip joint. You enjoyed yourself, but feel dirty and
hope that no one saw you go in or out.
 The plot of Lethal Weapon 4 is convoluted and really makes little sense.
The script is full of preposterous holes and dead ends. And yet ...
 The ease with which Gibson and Glover, along with series veterans Joe
Pesci and Rene Russo, slip back so comfortably into their roles allows for
an easy familiarity that lets you ignore all the movie's shortcomings as
you just tag along for the ride.
 The movie doesn't condescend to its audience as does, say, Armageddon.
>From the outset, Lethal Weapon 4 lets you know you're in for a fantasyland
shoot-'em-up, and any resemblance to real police work is purely
coincidental.
 Lethal Weapon 4 really is a big, expensive game of cops and robbers played
by a bunch of overage adolescents who had several million bucks to spend.
Consider it the most expensive home movie ever made.
 The team of producer Joel Silver and director Richard Donner know what the
audience wants - and gives them plenty of it. Lots of big bangs, car chases
and crashes, gunplay and fisticuffs, all done in such an outlandish manner
that you could probably substitute some of the critters from the Warner
Bros. animation stable and release the film with Wile E. Coyote and the
Road Runner instead of Gibson and Glover.
 A saving grace is that no one really takes the proceedings seriously,
especially not Gibson. He mugs, chuckles, rolls his eyes and continually
lets the audience know that he's having a frolic.
 Adding to the festivities is Chris Rock as an eager young detective who
teams up with veterans Riggs and Murtaugh to solve a case involving murder,
illegal smuggling and counterfeiting. The story, however, is secondary to
the interplay between the main protagonists.
 The only breath of fresh air is offered by Hong Kong action star Jet Li as
the main villain, a human killing machine. Li does some impressive martial
arts moves that will have the audience gasping.
 Lethal Weapon 4 is not art. It's not even good filmmaking. At a little
over two hours, it's a bit flabby and could have used some tighter editing.
But none of that really matters, does it?
 It's the action - the stunts and pyrotechnics - that will lure moviegoers.
Lethal Weapon 4 does what a movie of this caliber is supposed to do. It
will take your mind off the heat, the rain, the flooding - whatever. And
that's the bottom line, isn't it? If you go in with low expectations, you
will walk out satisfied.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
David Sunga
Written by: 
Jonathan Lemkin, Alfred Gough, Miles Millar, and Channing Gibson
Starring: 
Jet Li, Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, Joe Pesci, Chris Rock 
Ingredients: 
Goofball cops, oriental gangster, illegal immigrant trade
Synopsis: 
What a web of tangled comic situations. In LETHAL WEAPON 4 police
officer Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson) tries to get his partner Roger
Murtaugh (Danny Glover) to believe in the psychic power of positive
thinking. He also convinces Murtaugh that the reason a zany young cop
named Butters is so nice to Murtaugh is because Butters is secretly gay.
To make matters worse for the two cop partners, their irritating friend
Leo (Joe Pesci) has recently changed jobs from accountant to private
detective, and Leo insists on following them around. When together, the
talkative Leo and the gung ho Butters can easily spend an entire day
grousing about trivia. Meanwhile Murtaugh is trying to figure out who
his daughter's secret boyfriend is, and trying to keep secret an
embarrassing new source of income. Murtaugh also must swim away from a
big shark while on a fishing trip. 
On the other side of town sinister crime boss and money counterfeiter
Wah Sing Ku (5-time Chinese national wushu champ Jet Li) is running a
vicious slavery ring. The operation involves smuggling hopeful people
from China into America, in return for exorbitant sums of money that can
only be paid off by "indentured servitude" (slavery). 
Murtaugh and Riggs go after Wah Sing Ku's gang, resulting in high speed
chases, explosions, laughs, and some superlative martial arts moves on
the part of the incomparable Jet Li.
Opinion:
Sure, the characters are written a little older and wiser, but they're
also funnier. Riggs and Murtaugh entertain us, escaping certain death by
explosion and shootout, wisecracking all the way. Murtaugh's family even
gets to escape twice. I may be mistaken, but miraculously, his wife and
daughter appear captured in the burning building even after they have
already been rescued and set free after a standoff with the bad guys.
For those unfamiliar with the LETHAL WEAPON series, it consists of 4
movies not really about anything lethal, but about the exploits of
police partners Riggs and Murtaugh. Roger Murtaugh is an aging,
easygoing family man who loves his fishing boat, while his loyal younger
partner Riggs is a somewhat un-hinged prankster with suicidal
tendencies. The running gag is that old Roger secretly enjoys the madcap
adventures brought on by his unpredictable friend. To recap: In LW1
(1987) Riggs and Murtaugh nail the cold-blooded killer Mr. Joshua. In
LW2 (1989) they protect an irritating mob-accountant-turned-witness
named Leo (Joe Pesci), while busting a South African crime ring. In LW3
policewoman Lorna Cole (Rene Russo) falls in love with Riggs and helps
the partners put away a bad ex-cop. 
Characters Riggs, Murtaugh, Leo, and Lorna are all reunited in LETHAL
WEAPON 4, and a new comedian is added: Chris Rock as Officer Butters, a
gung ho young guy. LETHAL WEAPON 4 differs from the other movies in the
series in that the emphasis is more on comedy than on action, though it
still contains its quota of car chases, gunplay, explosions, and
hand-to-hand combat sequences. In my opinion, the fast-paced LETHAL
WEAPON 4 is one of the two best movies in the LETHAL WEAPON series.
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
David Wilcock
LETHAL WEAPON 4
(WARNER BROTHERS)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 7 MINUTES
STARRING MEL GIBSON AND DANNY GLOVER
DIRECTED BY RICHARD DONNER
The gangs all here, again, in this amiable action comedy. Gibson and Glover
are back as cops Riggs and Murtaugh, who both feel that they're 'getting too
old for this sh*t.' Well, it looked like the director, and the
scriptwriters, and getting too old also, as this movie is firmly stuck in
the 80's. Anyway, the boys are caught in a plot about illegal smuggling of
Chinese folks into America. Glover lets one of the families stay in his
home, but he's picked the wrong family. Bad guy Wah Sing Ku (Jet Li) is soon
looking for them, and then intent on getting rid of the lads, plus Rigg's
wife Lorna (Rene Russo) who is now nine months pregnant. Joining the good
guys is Chris Rock, supposedly 'playing' a character called Lee Butters, and
old favourite Joe Pesci as annoying side-kickabout Leo Getz. And, of course,
the familiar action and jokes are spread throughout the movie.
Well, maybe 'movie' isn't the right word for Lethal Weapon 4. Perhaps
're-union' is more like it. LW4 is less of a movie rather than a big
get-toghether of the cast and the director. Everyone seems to be having a
great time on-screen, all laughing and joking and have a 'good time.'
However, this dosen't convey to the audience, and we feel like spectators
looking though a window to a great party inside. Therefore, LW4 skimps on
script and character development, and concentrates of the jokes and action.
Actually, it centres on the jokes more, because it took a good 40 minutes
before the proper action began. Yes, LW4 suffers the problem of 'developing'
characters we are already familiar with and don't really care about. The
actors charms help pull of this slow start, however, and the chemistry
between Gibson, Glover and Pesci is magical.
When the action finally appears, it's well handled and fairly entertaining,
if somewhat familiar. There's the usual fist fights, gun shoots and car
chases. Sadly, there's no 'new' feel to them, they've been recycled from a
million films before. The writer, Alfred Gough, dosen't try anything too
original, and tries to stick to standard action fare, which is does very
well. The jokes are O.K, although their are funnier because of the cast, not
the jokes themselves. Gibson can make any gag seem great, and Chris Rock,
far better here than Doctor Dolittle, is a welcome addition with his Eddie
Murphy style delivery. Richard Donner gets the job done, and some of the set
pieces are well done, especially the first 10 minutes. Overall, though, it's
all a little underwhelming.
LW4 is far from being a bad movie, it's just not too good either. It's
marginally better than Lethal Weapon 3, but not as entertaining as the first
or second movie. While this type of movie was great in the 80's, it seems
out of place in the 90's where we expect action movies to have a little more
punch to them, and razzle dazzle. It's fun, and not boring, but in the end,
LW4 didn't really need to be made, and is just an excuse for everyone to get
back together. And the corny, ridiculous 'we're great friends' ending is one
of the funniest endings in movie history.
In other words, making a fifth movie would be like milking a dead cow.
Warner, please make Lethal Weapon now rest in peace. Amen.
DAVID WILCOCK Š1998
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Jamahl Epsicokhan
This review contains some minor spoilers for the feature film "Lethal
Weapon 4," but I promise not to give away any major revelations
concerning the plot.
Nutshell: An unfocused action film, but an amiable revisit to the
characters.
Cast includes: Mel Gibson (Martin Riggs), Danny Glover (Roger
Murtaugh), Joe Pesci (Leo Getz), Rene Russo (Lorna Cole), Chris Rock
(Lee Butters), Jet Li (Wah Sing Ku), Steve Kahan (Capt. Ed Murphy),
Kim Chan (Uncle Benny), Darlene Love (Trish Murtaugh), Traci Wolfe
(Rianne)
Ah, Martin Riggs and Roger Murtaugh, how well we've come to know them.
In "Lethal Weapon 4" they banter back and forth at a mile a minute,
exchanging one-liners so quickly that sometimes we can't keep up.
Sometimes we realize it's just as well we can't keep up; the jokes
probably wouldn't be all that funny if we didn't know these two and
their familiar shtick so well. The "Lethal Weapon" series has managed
to survive so long because it allows its lead characters to interact
in quirky, amusing ways, usually with rapid-fire dialogue exchange.
These two are the definitive team for the buddy cop formula. And Mel
Gibson and Danny Glover, who play the entertaining duo, usually look
like they're having a genuinely good time up there.
All things considered, "Lethal Weapon 4" is an entertaining but
muddled movie. I'll look back on it fondly because it puts these two
guys on the screen for one last dance. But the problem with "Lethal 4"
is that it's torn between two agendas and never quite finds the happy
medium.
On one hand we have a movie that tries tirelessly to bring us up to
date with the lives of all the characters we last saw six years ago in
"Lethal 3," while simultaneously introducing new characters into the
mix. On the other hand, we have the unfolding action movie cop plot,
which often seems so unfocused that it looks as if the screenwriters
considered it only as an afterthought.
On the character plane, we have Riggs and Murtaugh, who must set some
sort of record for continuing to talk at the same time. Meanwhile,
they must also set some sort of record for getting mileage out of what
should be increasingly stale jokes. As always, the two argue over just
when they should go when "going on three." And, of course, their
adventures are bound to answer the question of just how much of
Murtaugh's personal property can be destroyed in the course of a few
days. Here the potentially stale jokes seem more like old friends.
But when you bump into an old friend, that doesn't mean you can simply
ditch your job, which is what "Lethal 4" has a tendency to do. There
is a plot of sorts here, but it's so choppy and constantly interrupted
by more trivial matters that it's hard to get wrapped up in any of it.
It involves a mysterious martial arts expert from Hong Kong (Jet Li)
who is heading some sort of criminal conspiracy involving illegal
Chinese slave labor and some foreign prisoners. The nature of the
conspiracy I won't get into, but it takes so long for the movie to get
this aspect of the plot off the ground that the Li character simply
becomes one of those menacing, half-defined movie villains--and not
all that compelling of one, either. That's too bad, because Li has
some phenomenal martial arts moves.
Meanwhile, there's Li's connection to the murder of some immigrants
and Murtaugh's subsequent attempt to do right by inviting into his
home a family of homeless immigrants he finds at the crime scene. The
notion is amiable, and in the tradition of humanizing the "Lethal
Weapon" characters, but none of this really comes together to a
satisfactory resolution.
Director Richard Donner and the screenwriters don't seemed very
concerned about the plot. The film is more a comedy than anything
else, and plays more like a sitcom than a cop drama. Previous "Lethal"
movies managed to sustain some sort of serious dramatic undercurrent,
but "Lethal 4" can't seem to get its tongue out of its cheek for more
than five seconds at a time.
For example, Chris Rock appears in a major supporting role as a rookie
cop who joins Riggs' and Murtaugh's investigation. Much of Rock's
dialogue is fast and funny, but the personality isn't really a
character so much as an excuse to bring Rock's stand-up routine into
the movie. On that level, it's effective, but there's very little
story-building at work here, despite some of the obvious potential.
Even when it's revealed that Rock's character has been secretly
married to Murtaugh's daughter, it's played for sitcom laughs based on
contrived misunderstandings.
Joe Pesci's appearance as Leo Getz is merely perfunctory, as if he
came back just to recite his obligatory lines--although there's a
quirky scene where Rock and Pesci prove that louder can be better.
Rene Russo reprises her role as Internal Affairs officer Lorna Cole,
but because her character is pregnant she's forced out of most of the
action.
The other "Lethal" movies added something to the canvas of the
characters that felt like genuine development. This story,
unfortunately, is paper-thin and too interested in being lightweight,
warm, and fuzzy. Riggs and Murtaugh exist mostly to get on the screen
and engage their shtick full speed ahead, and not to face any new
personal challenges. Most of what they face in this movie is
trivialized merely to move the jokes along.
But even so, there's room for some stuff that's of interest. I
particularly enjoyed the notion that we've come full circle, and now
Riggs is finally feeling the burden of old age set in. No longer can
he beat the bad guy (or even his sparring partner) purely with his
manic physical prowess. Riggs is realizing that he himself, in the
tradition of the long-lived "Lethal" catchphrase, is "too old for this
s---."
Even if Riggs and Murtaugh *are* too old for such nonsense, the series
proves it still has some energy left in its action sequences. There's
an exhilarating chase sequence--involving Riggs being dragged down the
highway on a table attached with a plastic tarp to a mobile home--that
is gleefully destructive. I also liked the manic comic goofiness of
the opening minutes of the movie, where a madman in armor blow torches
an entire city block. A showdown with Li near the end is also nicely
staged, although it goes so far over the top that it becomes absurd.
There's also a bizarre interrogation scene that takes place in a
dental office, where, through events that I won't even begin to
describe, the room fills with nitrous oxide, causing everyone in the
room to laugh uncontrollably. The scene isn't one of the movie's high
points, but you've got to give the filmmakers credit for going all
out.
"Lethal Weapon 4" is the least of the series, but it serves its
purpose: It's goofy, mindless summer entertainment. It could've been
more than that, but for what it does it gets the job done.
It's obvious this film exists more to please fans of the "Lethal"
series--and to give its cast and crew their final curtain call--than
it does to tell a story. The ending has a ring of finality to it,
which is hammered home with a surprising overabundance of narcissism.
Indeed, the excessively cheesy final minutes of "Lethal Weapon 4" feel
almost like the final episode of a high-rated sitcom series. But I did
find the ending strangely infectious, even poignant.
I will miss Riggs and Murtaugh. And all of their friends and family as
well.
-----
Copyright (c) 1998 by Jamahl Epsicokhan, all rights reserved.
Unauthorized reproduction or distribution of this article is
prohibited.
Jammer's Movie Reviews - http://www.epsico.com/movies/
Jamahl Epsicokhan - jammer@epsico.com

Author
Joy Wyse
If there is any doubt that this sequel is not up to the original, forget
it.  It's every bit as good, if not better.  There is no problem if you're
one of the few people who didn't see any of the first three movies.  You
easily learn who the characters are and how they relate to each other.  In
its own way Lethal Weapon 4 reminds me of the old "Road" movies, or the
Abbott and Costello series.  Each one is able to stand on its own, but you
know the characters and you feel that you were watching old friends.  In
this  episode there are two new figures to entertain us.  One, Jet Li, is
a thing of beauty to behold.  As the cool, controlled bad guy, he moves
with the grace of a ballet dancer but the malice of the deadly killer that
he is.  The other, Chris Rock, becomes a continuing character as the new
son-in-law of Murtagh [Danny Glover].  Chris, like Joe Pesci, utters most
of the foul language in the film.  Strangely, it becomes comical when
Pesci tries to talk without swearing so that he can be quoted on TV. 
It is enjoyable  when seemingly unimportant scenes suddenly tie in and
become parts of the story.  If you catch them early enough, you have a
feeling of pride that you figured them out before they're explained.  
It's also great to be in on the joke, such as when Danny Glover thinks
that Chris Rock is gay, but we know that he is his son-in-law.
Although some of the stunts are highly improbable, they are nonetheless
entertaining.  By now, you've probably seen most of them on clips on TV. 
Even though you know that they are stunts and that everyone will survive,
they are still harrowing.  The fire is almost too real.
This is a very violent film with some stomach turning scenes.  The
garroting and the lancing made most adults grimace with pain.  As always,
there is plenty of humor surrounding the stars.  The chicken sequence is a
memorable on-running gag.  There are many, many moments that you keep
remembering.  That is the mark of a truly entertaining movie.  You keep
thinking about it.  I definitely want to see it again.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Richard Donner
Writer: Channing Gibson (story by Jonathan Lemkin, Alfred Gough, and Miles
Millar)
Starring: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock, Jet
Li, Darlene Love, Traci Wolf, Ebonie Smith, Damon Hines
We have reached that stage called comfort.  Those of you who've seen the
other three "Lethal Weapon" films, that is, like me or my dad or a couple
other people I know.  We saw the first one on video or TV and we adored it
so much that when the second one came out, we were there on opening night. 
We saw the third one opening night as well, and we've seen them all
numerous times on tape and TV and whatnot.  And judging by everything that
has gone down in those films, there's honestly very little you can do with
the series anymore.  Sure, you could, I dunno, make Rene Russo and Mel
Gibson's characters, who discovered an attraction between themselves in the
previous episode, get married and have kids.  Or continue the odyssey of
Danny Glover's character's daughter from baby to wife and mother.  But
would those really hold an entire movie.
So why don't we just give them a throwaway plot that we cut to every now
and then, introduce those elements that are there just to make the
characters change a bit, and then just let the characters...live.  Watching
"Lethal Weapon 4" is almost like a really relaxing reunion for everyone
who's been watching these films for the past decade, and who's just gotten
used to the constant bickering of the two protagonists, and the numerous
deadly follies they get into.  I saw this film on opening night, filled
with a crowd of people who no doubtedly had seen the other three and were
just returning not because the movie's previews looked nice, but because
it's yet another misadventure for a bunch of really likable characters that
have grown on us.
Henceforth, "Lethal Weapon 4" is not so much a continuation of the series
as it is a present for the fans, just to keep them smiling and laughing
along with the characters.  It's as if they all knew that the series would
be pretty stale if they tried to make things fresh, so they gave up and
just had fun with it.  And watching this film is like watching flawless
chemistry between actors and between the audience and what's on the screen.
 Those of us who've come to see this film because it's just another chance
to see Riggs and Murtaugh (Mel Gibson and Danny Glover, still sharing
flawless chemistry) laugh with eachother and their supporting character
friends will most likely laugh right along with them.
The plot itself, as I said, is pretty thin, and seems to be a slight
recycling from the sorta-forgettable anti-Asian Crichton novel and it's
later film adaptation, "Rising Sun."  It's something or other with Chinese
Triad members, some people sold into a kind of modern slavery so they can
live in America, and one really bad-ass guy named Wah Sing Ku, played by a
guy named Jet Li, who acts with a cool distance and is able to do any
acrobatic fight sequence that he reminds us of a wannabe Bruce Lee crossed
with Jackie Chan.  Anyways, it's basically just there to fill time, and,
with the exception of promises of big, fun, over-the-top action sequences
as well as some cool moves from Jet Li (or both), it's pretty much
distracting from the real reason we've come to see this...
...and that's for the characters and what's going on with them.  Things are
constantly changing in their lives, and the film takes the time to show
that Riggs and his now-pregnant girlfriend from the last film, Lorna Cole
(Rene Russo) are actually considering marriage, and that Murtaugh's oldest
daughter is really growing up as she's pregnant and actually hiding her
marriage to a cocky police officer named Lee Butters (Chris Rock) a secret
because Murtaugh doesn't want her marrying a cop.  And Leo Getz is still
there, although now he's a P.I.  And, as an added bonus which is rarely
revisited, Riggs and Murtaugh, out of desperation by the department to get
them out of the streets without firing them, are promoted to Captain.  The
main new addition, taking in accordance with the others which added a
member each installment (number 2 it was Pesci, number 3 it was Russo), is
Butters, although he's unfortunately not really a major character, at least
not as major a character as Getz and Cole were when they were introduced. 
He's mainly there to give the film a new area of attraction since he's
mighty hot right now (and with good reason - he's hilarious, though he's
only allowed to use his hilarious style a couple times).
But we also come to see the action sequences, which in this film are
numerous and always crazy.  This is where the films always differ, and what
makes this film a bit inferior to the other three.  Those films took their
action sequenes rather seriously, and their plots were handled as a kind of
contrast to the hilarity the film had in the downtime.  Sure, they were
witty and over-the-top, but the ones in this movie, at least some of them,
are almost annoyingly campy.  The finale, a huge silent fight between
Riggs, Murtaugh, and Li is a long, totally proposterous sequence that ends
satisfyingly...sorta.  And after awhile, they get a bit tiresome.  The only
sequence which really becomes memorable is one in the middle involving a
car chase and a truck dragging Riggs on a table across a highway that is so
over-the-top that it's brilliantly enigmatic.  It's also so goofy and
hilarious that when it was over, the entire audience, who was in stitches
by the last crash, gave it a hearty applaud.
If anything, this film is disappointing in that it's plot is weak, flimsy,
and basically just there to kill time, something that the plots in the
other films weren't.  We were able to really get a big kick out of the
action sequences, and were always in awe of the plots and their numerous
villains.  Remember how amazingly tense the first one got then how it could
effortlessly shift to comedy (same for the second)?  None of that here -
it's all on autopilot.  But with a nice sugar coating of lots of character
comedy that is basically only humerous to those who've lived with the
characters for so long, this film actually comes off as being sucessful. 
It's all because this film comes as the fourth in the series, and we've
found them at a point when it's not even about the plot or the money: it's
about just getting back together and making a movie they can have fun with.
 And it's about us just coming back because we feel like we're all part of
their extended family.  And basically we are.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Summer is the time for action movies so director Richard Donner
competes in the Explode-o-Rama by opening LETHAL WEAPON 4 with - count
'em - three big pyrotechnics displays in a row.  The gasoline truck
fireball is followed by Chinese freighter fireworks followed by that old
reliable, the car demolished by a speeding train.  Whew.  And that all
happens in the first 10 minutes or so.
     The movie itself is such a hopeless retread of the previous LETHAL
WEAPON movies that you wonder why Donner even tried.  Channing Gibson
wrote the screenplay, and three other writers are credited with the
story, which is surprising since there isn't much of a story.  The only
idea seemed to be that they would get the film's stars together again
and let them repeat their same old schtick.
     Mel Gibson and Danny Glover are back as Martin Riggs and Roger
Murtaugh.  They've been promoted to captains so that the police
department can get insurance.  It seems that their brand of destructive
police work causes more damage than the insurance company will allow.
     Riggs's girlfriend and would-be wife, Lorna Cole (Rene Russo), is
pregnant.  This plot device allows her to be threatened with a knife at
her belly by the bad guy and makes Riggs question whether he is ready
again for marriage.
     For symmetry's sake and to be able to introduce Chris Rock as a
character, Murtaugh is about to become a grandfather.  Unbeknownst to
Murtaugh, the secret father is Lee Butters (Rock), a young cop in his
precinct.
     Amidst all of this domestic soap opera, Joe Pesci is back, and this
time his character, Leo Getz, has become a PI (Private Investigator).
Violating the well-established rule that a little bit of Joe Pesci goes
a long way, Donner lets Pesci's grating humor permeate way too much of
the movie.
     Easily the best part of the film is the appearance of Chinese
acting star and martial arts expert Jet Li as the movie's villain, Wah
Sing Ku.  With moves of ballet-like precision and artistry, he dazzles
the audience.
     The best part of the original LETHAL WEAPON was its humor, which is
almost absent from its fourth version.  Lee Butters's reading of the
Miranda rights is a hoot, but most of the remaining jokes are stale.
Any script that has to fall back on "flied lice" jokes about Chinese
food as a way to try to get a laugh has pretty much lost it.
     Although one is probably not supposed to think through the logic of
the action in LETHAL WEAPON movies, some of the events may cause your
brain to spin a bit.  Take just one example.  How many cops would drive
with just one car full of officers to confront a gang full of dozens and
dozens of bloodthirsty men.
     Several times Riggs and Murtaugh complain that they're too old to
be still doing this stuff.  They are so right, and one can only hope
that they will take their own advice in the future.
     LETHAL WEAPON 4 runs too long at 2:07.  It is rated R for profanity
and strong violence and would be fine for most teenagers.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock, Jet Li, 
Steve Kahan, Kim Chan, Darlene Love, Traci Wolfe, Eddy Ko, Steven Lam, 
Richard Libertini. Directed by Richard Donner. 127 minutes
Rated R, 2.5 stars (out of five stars) 
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
All icing, no cake. That pretty much sums up "Lethal Weapon 4." Having 
decided that the appeal of the buddy cop franchise was action, jokes and 
the chemistry between Mel Gibson and Danny Glover, the powers that be 
apparently decided to discard such antiquated elements as character 
development and coherent plotting, opting instead to create a film of 
virtually nothing but action, jokes and the chemistry between Gibson and 
Glover. And so we have "Lethal Weapon 4," a 127 minute stunt and shtick 
extravaganza. 
In the stunt department, a car crashes into a building, drives through, 
crashes out the other side and continues pursuing the bad guys. Very cool.
 Mel's stunt double climbs from vehicle to vehicle during a high speed 
freeway chase. Jet Li moves quite adroitly while kicking the crap out of 
everybody. There's lots and lots of big explosions too, along with the 
series' trademark sadism.
Moving on to the shtick, Mel plays lots of wacky practical jokes on his 
partner and best friend Danny. He gets him to dance in his underwear to 
"distract" a lunatic. Later, he repeatedly fastens newspaper photos of 
Danny in his underwear to the cubicle walls in the police station. He 
tricks Danny into believing that Chris Rock is gay and infatuated with 
him. And so on.
In-between the jokes and fights, there's a couple of pregnancies thrown 
in, along with a nominal, extremely murky plot about Chinese people doing 
bad things. The film's recurring theme is family, which is nice.
It's all very fast-paced and pretty entertaining on its own terms, but my 
thoughts kept drifting back to the first "Lethal Weapon." I remembered 
the agony of that scene where Gibson, as the suicidal Martin Riggs, sat 
quivering with the barrel of a gun in his mouth, crying tears of 
frustration when he couldn't pull the trigger. I remembered Danny Glover, 
as quintessential family man Roger Murtaugh, nursing his partner through 
his anguish, displaying remarkable nobility and compassion. Sure, "Lethal 
Weapon" was often cheesy and lurid, but I cared about those men.
Watching the fourth installment of the series, I realized how much I 
missed Riggs and Murtaugh, back when they were people instead of the Two 
Stooges. Sure, I laughed at a lot of Gibson's puns and wisecracks, but 
missed the man behind the jokes. With Danny Glover, witnessing his 
sputtering straight man bit actually became embarrassing. At what point 
in the series was it decided that Murtaugh didn't need his dignity 
anymore?
As for the rest of the cast, aside from an absurd, but nifty fight scene, 
Rene Russo is relegated to the background, although she gets more screen 
time than the rest of the womenfolk. Joe Pesci returns as the 
extraordinarily irritating Leo Getz, punctuating his constant yammering 
with his "Okay! Okay!" catch phrase. As if that wasn't annoying enough, 
Chris Rock joins the proceedings with his own shrill brand of fingernails-
on-the-blackboard verbal torture. The nadir of the film comes during a 
scene where Rock and Pesci exchange rapid fire banalities. I swear to God,
 if I'd had an Uzi at that moment I would have happily riddled the screen 
with bullets.
Thankfully, "Lethal Weapon 4" wraps up with a genuinely warm, family 
scrapbook scene that almost makes everything else forgivable. It's as if 
the cast was saying "Folks, we're doing this for the last time. We know 
it's all ridiculous, but we're just having fun and we hope that you had 
some too." And, to a certain extent, I did. But it's hard to watch 
talented performers throw plot, character development, logic and 
credibility away in favor of playing caricatures in a high-octane free-
for-all. I guess I'm just getting too old for this shit.

Author
Homer Yen
Just how inseparable is the team of Sgt. Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson) and
Sgt. Roger Murtaugh (Danny Glover)?  Let's just say that when one
partner asks the other partner to strip to his boxer shorts and then
further asks him to run out into the middle of the road, flapping his
arms while feverishly cackling like a chicken just to create a
distraction, his partner actually does it!
The familiar Lethal Weapon family is back, including Rene Russo, who is
now the expectant mother of Riggs' child and Joe Pesci as the
soprana-like, foul-mouthed former accountant who has decided to become a
private eye.  New to the team is Chris Rock, also a fast-talking, up and
coming detective.  Trouble seems to follow the two veteran detectives
where ever they go, and in this film, that is no exception.  Even when
they are just taking a leisurely boat ride, they somehow manage to
collide with a freighter ship.  We here some ominous music, which clues
us that a confrontation is about to happen.  Gunfire ensues, and when
it's all over, the detectives want to learn more about this freighter by
questioning a Chinatown crime lord.  
Although they don't know what they're looking for, their inquisitiveness
causes the bad guys to take some action.  And there's plenty of action
here for two movies.  Led by fighting sensation Jet Li, whose martial
arts skill is nothing less than impressive, he does what he can to make
sure that no one finds out what they are up to.  Li is ruthless in his
approach, will kill anyone just to make a point, and develops enormous
disdain for the two detectives.
There are terrific car chases, explosions and gunshot galore.  It's a
summer action recipe followed to the letter, and the result is nothing
less than pure, unadulterated summer fun.  But even too many explosions
can get boring.  To counter that, we are treated to several amazingly
choreographed fight sequences with Jet Li.  Luckily, he'd rather fight
hand-to-hand instead of firing off guns.  Meanwhile, when the detectives
aren't reloading their guns or running from fireballs, they're engaged
in sophomoric banter and silly conversations that provide a nice
diversion from the hail of bullets.  Everybody gets in on the shtick.
Russo screams during her delivery, the crime lord has a few funny bits
when he's being interrogated while being given laughing gas, and Pesci
and Rock are very funny as they go at it discussing the drawbacks of
having cellular phones.  Gibson and Glover are always in sync and the
film moves at a brisk pace to get to the final and terrific mano a mano.
Score one for the Old Guard.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
I try not to go into films with extreme expectations in either
direction, but when it comes to a series that, in my opinion, has
outstayed its welcome, I can't help but be skeptical.  Such was the case
with Lethal Weapon 4, the previews for which all made the film look like
a big joke of a movie.  Before seeing it, the biggest surprise I got was
finding out that it's actually rated R, and that the producers hadn't
wimped out and gone for the PG-13 rating to make the audience wider.  
I love the first two films, because they center around the characters
and their realistic struggles.  Sure, they're funny movies, and quirky a
lot of the time, but they're also gritty in such a way that sets them
apart from other buddy-cop movies.  Lethal Weapon 3 is a bore, a
formulaic and mediocre action film in every way.  I figured the fourth
film would be even worse, going strictly for laughs without presenting
its story with any degree of seriousness.  And I was right -- Lethal
Weapon 4 does go mostly for laughs, and doesn't take its own story
seriously.  And, oddly enough, it works.  It's not risky, nor is it near
the quality of the first two films, but it's fun and effective as
entertainment.  It also expands on the characters in a surprisingly full
way, and any sequel that does this has my respect.
As the posters all say, "The gang's all here!"  This, of course, refers
to Riggs (Mel Gibson) and Murtaugh (Danny Glover).  It also refers to
the large assemblage of supporting characters, including Leo Getz (Joe
Pesci), Lorna (Rene Russo), and now Detective Butters (Chris Rock). 
Five protagonists is a bit steep for any film, even a two-hour-plus
action movie (especially a two-hour-plus action movie), but, thankfully,
Lethal Weapon 4 doesn't regress to Batman & Robin status -- none of the
characters are pointless or underused.
The story, however, is a little on the weak side.  Well, it's actually
about as weak as any story I've heard this year.  It centers around some
bad Chinese men (led by a very bad man played by Jet Li), who attempt to
counterfeit a large sum of money to bring a few Chinese diplomats
(perhaps they are diplomats...the film never quite explains their
significance) into America, where, according to Li's character, laws can
be avoided using money.  What I've described takes place only in the
final hour of the film; the first hour is spent in limbo, where we see
our heroes delivering some truly well-written dialogue.    
In any event, director Richard Donner is clearly more interested in the
subplots, probably because the subplots are far more interesting.  All
the female characters begin the film pregnant; Riggs' struggles come
when he realizes that Lorna wants to marry him.  Meanwhile, Murtaugh's
daughter is pregnant and married to Butters, but they've kept these
rather large secrets from her father.  Then there's Leo, who is, once
again, present for no discernable reason except to profusely utilize the
f-word and extract large bouts of laughter from the audience.
I don't often enjoy films when it's obvious that basically no thought
was put into the story.  This is a film that doesn't rely on plotting or
pacing, but on dialogue and individual episodes.  The film is so
successful as a comedy that I'm strangely dictated to ignore the serious
shortcomings in the story and simply enjoy it for the masterful and
fluid way in which it's been presented.  The action is nothing
particularly new, but it holds with the standards of the series.  There
is, however, a truly excellent finale which takes place on a dock in the
rain at night.  And I liked the scene that had Riggs surfing the street
on a wooden table.  
It's odd, really, that the film entirely forfeits a chance at a story,
and still manages character development.  It's nice to see that the
characters who've been brought back are the same, and fleshed out a
little bit more (even Riggs and Murtaugh).  It's also nice to see a
colorful supporting cast put to good use -- Rock is terrific and
hilarious as Murtaugh's new son-in-law, while Joe Pesci has removed
himself from my Most Hated Actors list by delivering a strangely
affecting and truly funny performance.  Li makes an effective and
sometimes-sympathetic villain.  And, of course, Gibson and Glover
maintain their undeniable chemistry which has made the series so popular
over the last decade.
Some people think that sheer entertainment value isn't enough to make a
film worth watching.  I think that it is, and when a film is as
skillfully assembled as Lethal Weapon 4, there's no reason to trash it
just because the story is absurd.  Sure, a better story would have made
a better movie, and I didn't always get the feeling that the people
involved were interested in making a good movie.  But that's irrelevant
-- I laughed, and the full theater of people with whom I watched this
film laughed, too.  I also cared about the characters, and felt good
when Riggs sees his newborn daughter for the first time.  Oh, who needs
a story, anyway?  

Author
Bill Chambers
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers
New address. Same old attitude. Don't forget to recommend a film,
read the journal, or send me some of that nasty HATE MAIL.)
In the first Lethal Weapon, Mel Gibson's character Martin Riggs would
break into "Three Stooges" routines and
handcuff himself to suicidal jumpers-these were actions meant to
characterize an insane, unstable human being.
They called him a "lethal weapon"; he had a death wish for both anyone
who crossed him and, most importantly, for
himself. 1998 brings us LETHAL WEAPON 4 and the plot itself has become
something of a Three Stooges routine,
with Gibson, Glover (as Roger "Too Old For This Shit" Murtaugh) and
Pesci (as opportunistic Leo Getz) doing
everything but bashing each other with sledge hammers and "nyuk
nyuk"-ing. It is precisely for this reason that
some will dismiss or dislike LETHAL WEAPON 4, while others will find
comfort in its familiarity and congenial
tone.
While fishing one night, said lethal trio encounter a slave ship;
naturally, a gunfight ensues, with Triad members
protecting their boatload of Chinese immigrants. Riggs and
Murtaugh-promoted to police captains this time
around-eventually uncover a secret: Chinese families are being traded as
slaves in some sort of underground
operation in Los Angeles' Chinatown district. Murtaugh elects to hide
one of the families at his house until the case
is solved, which triggers a chain reaction of violence. Wah Sing Ku (Jet
Li) pursues Murtaugh and his stolen family;
Ku employs lightning-fast Martial Arts moves as well as a team of
shameless yes-men who strike at the captains in
water, on land, and in water again. Meanwhile, Murtaugh's daughter is
pregnant (Murtaugh doesn't know the baby
belongs to Lee Butters (Rock), a detective who gamely joins the
investigation), as is Gibson's girlfriend (Rene
Russo, kicking up a storm as she did in the last instalment, even whilst
bearing a child).
Jet Li moves with such speed and grace his movements almost provoke
laughter in the fight scenes: since Riggs
and Murtaugh are no match for Ku, the hand-to-hand combat plays like
slapstick. I was reminded of that Bugs
Bunny cartoon in which Bugs gets into a ring with a heavyweight boxer
(or is it wrestler?) and wins because he
better understands the laws of cartoon physics; likewise, Gibson and
Glover exercise enough movie-logic-and
they have the benefit of three prequels under their belt-to put up a
good fight. The action scenes (which also
include Riggs riding a coffee table-yes, coffee table-along the L.A.
Freeway as he is dragged by a truck) are
thrilling and inventive and satisfyingly ludicrous, but they seem like
an afterthought. Whenever the banter runs on
too long, something blows up. This isn't a problem, really, since the
banter is relaxed, cute, and, despite the
presence of much profanity, harmless. Gone is the dark heart of Lethal
Weapon 2; director Donner has turned the
franchise into something of a Sunday dinner-is it any wonder he included
photos of the cast and crew goofing
around off-camera as part of the end-credit sequence? Rock makes a nice
addition to the cast, but Pesci has worn
out his welcome. He's a terrific actor, but his performance has
degenerated over three movies into a one-note
impersonation of his original portrayal of Leo Getz. He has a nice
moment at the end of the picture, delivering a
sweet monologue, but it's too little, too late. Jet Li, on the other
hand, is a charismatic presence. I hope his
inevitable journey through the Hollywood machine lands him a film in
which he has a worthy opponent and a decent
screenplay supporting him.
Some critics have complained that LETHAL WEAPON 4 is completely
extraneous, that it has nothing to say. Did
this series ever have something to say? I for one fell in with its tone
and rolled with it-the worst scene in this movie
is better than the best scene in, say, Armageddon or Godzilla. Yet I'm
not exactly thrilled with the prospect of
LETHAL WEAPON 5; everyone involved really is getting too old for this
shit.

Author
R. L. Strong
Warner Brothers presents a Silver Pictures production in association with
Donner/Schuler-Donner Productions   
Mel Gibson   Danny Glover  
a Richard Donner film
"LETHAL WEAPON 4"    
Joe Pesci   Rene Russo    Chris Rock   Jet Li   Steve Kahan
Kim Chan  Darlene Love   
Co-Producers: Dan Cracchiolo & J. Mills Goodloe
Edited by Dallas Puett & Frank J. Urioste  
Cinematographer:  Andrzej Bartkowiak
Original Music by Eric Clapton, Michael Kamen & David Sanborn
Production Designer: J. Michael Riva   Costume Designer: Ha Nguyen
Associate Producers: Spencer Franklin,  Jennifer Gwartz &  Ilyse A. Reutlinger
Executive Producers: Steve Perry & Jim Van Wyck  
Produced by Richard Donner & Joel Silver
Original Story by Johnathan Lemkin  
Screenplay by Alfred Gough, Miles Millar, Channing Gibson and Shane Black   
Directed by Richard Donner
Rated R       Running time: 127 minutes
Sequels are not usually a promising commodity. In most cases it's an
exercise in excess. More action, more violence, more noise,
etc. etc. What is hoped for in these franchises is that you have
something to connect with. And hopefully that is the characters that
made the original film so enjoyable. With the release of Richard
Donner's fourth and final entry in the LETHAL WEAPON series we are
given a serviceable plot with more character interaction than any of
the previous films in the series.
The story opens with our heroic trio Riggs, Murtaugh and Leo Getz
enjoying a late night out on Roger's finished boat. Unfortunately they
run afoul of an uncharted cargo ship which wrecks their fishing
boat. Giving chase, they crash the ship onto the docks. Riggs suffers
a surprise attack by an asian martial artist (James Lew), and is
unable to catch any of the bad guys. Murtaugh and Getz manage to save
themselves and soon the three discover that the cargo ships hold is
filled with illegal aliens from China. After the police arrive,
Murtaugh discovers a family of Chinese hiding in one of the row
boats. Feeling a sense of familial responsibility, Murtaugh takes the
family (against proper procedure) under his wing, giving them
sanctuary in his own home.
It is soon learned that there is an underground market for slave labor
from China in L.A. A custom of paying a debt through labor. But there
is more to this incident than that. As Murtaugh and Riggs investigate
the situation further they find more evidence leading to the purchase
of four Triad leaders from mainland China. But there is even more
subterfuge involved. The cost of rescuing these four criminals is
millions of dollars in Chinese currency. What the Triads have done is
hired through debt, a Chinese artist to counterfeit Chinese
currency. These plates are to be used to print the money with which
the Triads are to pay the corrupt Chinese officials. The debt being
paid is the delivery of his Brother's family to America.
"Lethal Weapon 4" is a wonderfully entertaining continuation of the
popular franchise. While the plot is a little light in development, it
holds your attention. What makes this film so enjoyable is, of coarse
the chemistry between Gibson and Glover. The friendship between these
two characters has moved beyond the standard homo-erotic essence of
the earliest films. These men are now family, brothers of
spirit. Riggs in the film plays with a zen like philosophy of mental
will power. He is coming to terms with his mortality. This is
amplified by the pregnancy of Larna Cole (Rene Russo). Riggs must lay
down his loss and his mania, if he is to survive. And it is this act
of conformity that almost costs him his life. As in the earlier
sequels, Riggs is becoming less of a lethal weapon, while Murtaugh is
becoming more of one. Murtaugh in each succeeding film has placed his
family in more and more danger, and that is because he is also a
lethal weapon, like Riggs but has conformed and masked that quality in
himself ("I'm too old for this shit"), but always manages to return to
what may have been a former self in times of stress and need. With
this film both characters are questioning their age and what their
life is going to become. Hence, this may be the last film in the
series, since Riggs and Murtaugh have to convince themselves that
'They are not too old'.
The main villain Wah Sing Ku is played by Hong Kong superstar Jet Li,
and his inclusion in this film is revolutionary. Never on U.S. screens
have we seen this masterful a presentation of martial artistry since
Bruce Lee. This man looks deadly. His calm, seemingly emotionless
demeanor is simply a mask hiding a raging tiger. When Mr. Li lets
loose, you can only be certain that you'll want to see more of this
incredibly talented man.
Chris Rock is added to the cast as Lee Butters, and he brings his
trademark style of rapid fire comedy to the team. The secret to his
character is that he is married to Murtaugh's daughter (unknown to
Murtaugh), and treats his stepfather with so much respect, that
Murtaugh mistakes the younger mans attention as possibly homosexual in
context.
All of the characters in the film act on behalf of their families. So,
while Jet Li may be the villain of the piece, he has as strong a
conviction and moral purpose as Riggs or Murtaugh. This is the best
development in the script.
Richard Donner continues to prove that he can direct an action film in
his sleep. His style is so effortless and uncomplicated that the film
moves with a brisk and flawless pace. This is no faint
praise. Mr. Donner is becoming of of our best Directors. The script by
Alfred Gough, Miles Millar, Channing Gibson and Shane Black is
remarkably tight considering the differing styles of each author. This
is a credit to producer Joel Silver and Richard Donner, who's sense of
story and character is as strong as ever.
Lethal Weapon 4 is a fine piece of entertainment and a worthy finish
to a classic series. Why do I call this the last of the series. Well
durring the end credits, we are shown a photo album with photos past
and present of all four films. The last shot is of the book
closing.. on the series.
On a scale of *****, "Lethal Weapon 4' rates ****.
Copyright 1998 R. L. Strong.Nothing in this article may be reprinted
or copied without the expressed written permission of the author.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Warner Bros./ Silver Pictures
 Director:  Richard Donner
 Writer: Channing Gibson, story by Jonathan Lemkin
 Cast: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo,
Chris Rock, Jet Li
   You don't expect credibility in summer's action-adventure
movies, but at least "Least Weapon 4" includes one statement
which is absolutely true.  "We're too old for this," complains
Detective Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson) to his partner Roger
Murtaugh (Danny Glover).  Truth to tell the two should have
quit after the snappy, original first time around, one sequel
tops.  This time we get the usual fine action sequences and
look in on the martial arts skills of a new talent.  He is
handsome Jet Li as a gangster who is so cool that he can
stand still, arms folded, grinning, and watch his buddies try to
fight off the cops, jumping into the fray only when his team is
about to lose.  With a few leaps, kicks and thrusts of his
deadly hands, he is invincible, once even fighting off both
Riggs and Murtaugh with a pole penetrating his entire body
from belly to back.
   With Richard Donner once again at the helm, "Lethal
Weapon 4" blends a combination of good-natured humor,
slapstick, violence and even some maudlin sentimentality.
Partners Riggs and Murtaugh, both promoted from sergeant
to captain overnight, wisecrack their way from the usual alpha
to the customary omega in rounding up an ending the careers
of some fun gangster and evil mobsters alike.  The supporting
cast have joined up once again in similar capacities: Joe
Pesci performs in the role of a private investigator, just as
noisome and as cuddly as he was in "Lethal Weapon 2." 
Rene Russo is Lorna Cole, who is Riggs' significant other,
Stuart Wilson is the put-upon c.o. of the detective duo and
Chris Rock joins the crew as a new breed of cop and one
who is secretly married to Detective Murtaugh's daughter.
   The story opens on an action sequence that has nothing to
do with the principal plot, in much the style of the James
Bond series.  The daring duo tackling a nut case who thinks
he's a video game: a guy covered from head to toe in
impenetrable armor who is torching all the stores on a city
block, shooting at the two main cops from an automatic
weapon while Riggs and Murtaugh banter about their coming
child and grandchild respectively.  After dispatching the
unprincipled varmint, the detectives take action against a
group of smugglers, enlisting the help of their Sancho Panza,
Leo Getz (Joe Pesci), Private eye.  The plot is almost as
impenetrable as "The X-Files: Fight the Future" but seems to
involve a plan to bring Chinese illegals into the country to
work as indentured servants for the bootleggers.  In a design
involving two rival Chinese gangs, the Triads seek to buy
these slaves back from the Four Fathers using counterfeit
Chinese money.  
   Though the detectives realize eventually that the only way
to defeat these master criminals is to have them fight it out
among themselves and kill one another off, they are
themselves in heaps of trouble.  In one situation they are left
to die in a burning house because criminals still have not
learned: shoot the cops first.  In another, the two are involved
in an underwater skirmish with the picture's karate kid.  
   For the women in the audience, presumably, director
Donner milks some sentiment by having Murtaugh adopt a
hapless family of Chinese illegals (who are ultimately granted
asylum even though such asylum has rarely been granted
before to folks in their situation).  A terminally silly scenes is
tacked on in the end, involving the usual jokes about a
pregnant woman about to give birth but is "not ready" to do
so.
   "Lethal Weapon 4" is simply an assortment of takes
involving jokes and jocks, a wholly unncessary appendage to
Gibson and Glover's previous work, but one which
undoubtedly will hit the number one spot in the box office
given the lack of competition during the weekend of its
opening.  

Author
Chris Bumbray
I had the opportunity today to see the long awaited Lethal Weapon 4, being
this it's release date. Let me first mention that I am a very big fan of
this classic action series. The series has changed since it was first
established. It has gone from a hard edged action drama to a more comedic
style adventure series. To some this is bad news, to some this is good news.
I personally enjoy the entire series. Lethal Weapon 4 is similar in essence
to Lethal Weapon 3. It is a highly charged action adventure/comedy drama.
                                                                        The
plot begins simple but throws many curves. Riggs (Mel Gibson) and Murtagh
(Danny Glover) are fishing with Leo (Joe Pesci) in Murtagh's boat. Leo
catches a shark and is trying to determine what to do with it. Suddenly a
massive tanker appears and begins firing on our heroes. They discover the
boat is full of illegal Chinese immigrants sold into slave labor. A family
takes refuge in Murtagh's boat and Murtagh takes them into his home. They
are soon begin an investigation which leads them to a triad boss played by
Jet Li. I don't want to reveal more of the plot so all I will say is this
ends up in the usual bang- bang method with some subplots thrown in
involving Lorna (Rene Russo), Riggs's girlfriend being pregnant with Riggs's
baby and Murtagh's daughter being pregnant by Chris Rock. Riggs's also
confronts feelings of marriage and his dead wife.  The first hour of the
movie is basically a comedy, and the second hour is non stop action with
some dramatic moments thrown in.
I thought the movie was fun and exciting, and that it raised interesting
questions about our two middle-aged heroes getting older. The sole fault in
this movie is it's sappy ending that seems to belong on Family Matters. Joe
Pesci even has a monologue about his pet frog (named froggy) that he had as
a child.  Besides that the movie is riveting and the final incredible
shootout and fight in the factory must be seen to be believed. Jet Li easily
steals the picture as the villain. His martial arts powers are amazing. In
the final fight you even may find yourselves thinking our heroes are done
for!
9.5/10 (It would be 10 if it weren't for the aforementioned sappy ending)

Author
Jerry Saravia
Who would have thought that a decade later the "Lethal Weapon" franchise would
turn into an unfunny, Cosby-like comedy about family values with some
exploitative violence thrown in? Not only that, but remove all the elements
that made the first three films exciting and fresh. 
Let's consider the first "Lethal Weapon," a tough-as-nails buddy-buddy police
actioner with a badass Mel Gibson as the suicidal Martin Riggs. Here was a
ticking time bomb ready to die at any given moment - regardless of the
consequences. Let's also consider Roger Murtaugh (Danny Glover), a family man
who served in Vietnam and is getting ready to face old age. The two were an
unbeatable pair, and they also faced one of the best villains in the history of
action films, played by Gary Busey! The point was that a mutual camaraderie
existed between them.
The second film was purely action and laughs with the very funny and oily Joe
Pesci as the accountant, Leo Getz ("Whatever you want, Leo gets!"). It also set
the standard for one of the best, most explosive action scenes ever. The third
film went further with the comedy, and too much action. There was little or no
character development, and the introduction of the Internal Affairs officer,
Lorna (Rene Russo), resulted in one of the weakest entries of the series. 
So what's left in "Lethal Weapon 4"? Not much I am afraid. Riggs is now a
respectable citizen with short hair, ready to settle down, and no longer lethal
(Is this the same suicidal freak from the first film?). Chris Rock is shown
briefly and doesn't figure much in the story, except that he gets Murtaugh's
daughter pregnant. Murtaugh is unaware that Rock is the father, and thinks he's
gay. Riggs's girlfriend, Lorna, is also pregnant and wants to get married! 
Funny, indeed. Leo Getz is back as a private investigator, and he is unbearable
throughout with his continual "whatevers" and "okays." The thin story has to do
with Chinese gangsters conspiring in some threadbare plot about counterfeit
money, and led by a formidable villain (Jet Li), a martial-arts expert - a true
lethal weapon. And there are the requisite explosions, implausible action
scenes, and typically racist jokes aimed squarely at the Chinese. 
"Lethal Weapon 4" looks like it was assembled rather than directed. One car
chase here, one fist fight there, one obvious joke here, and so on. There's no
plot or story to speak of. No shred of acting skills either, despite the
high-powered cast, although Jet Li says a lot with one stare, here and there.
It's like a tired parody of the "Lethal Weapon" experience, and its ickily
sentimental, heavily overwrought last passage - involving Pesci's
unintentionally funny monologue and dual pregnancies - left me in a state of
dumbfounded shock. There's never any sense of danger or peril, and no sense of
communion or camaraderie between the characters. It's "Lethally Bland Weapon"
for dummies.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
'Lethal Weapon 4' is the film Mel Gibson said he would never do.  Never
say never.  With a pay cheque of 20 million dollars and a guarantee of
20 per cent of the film's earnings, "never" is a word the isn't found in
Mel's vocabulary.  This is a film made for one reason and one reason
only:  pure profit!  That is always the case with sequels but in the
case of Warner Brothers, it is particularly a show of desperation since
they have had a number of flops recently and need a hit badly.  I don't
have a problem with movie sequels because in many ways, they're
equivalent to visiting an old friend as you come back for more and more
fun each time.
'Lethal Weapon 4' isn't a terrible movie, it's just one too many and the
franchise is starting to show one thing: AGE!  Mel Gibson, Danny Glover,
Joe Pesci and Rene Russo are all starting to show signs of aging.  Not
too badly but in comparison to the other films: a lot.
As 'Lethal Weapon 4' opens, the streets of L.A. are once again
endangered, this time by a psychotic, protected with body armor who
fires automatic rounds and shots from a flame-thrower in any direction
he pleases.  Riggs and Murtaugh (Gibson and Glover) eventually put a
stop to his antics with humourous results and the film move forward from
there.
The central plot of 'Lethal Weapon 4' is an immigrant smuggling ring run
by an old Asian warlord whose right hand man (Jet Li) is a cool and
frightening martial arts expert who silences his enemies by putting his
moves on them.
Some of the immigrants brought to America are to work as slaves and
Murtaugh takes a family under his wing and has them live at home with
his wife and children as a way of understanding how slavery affected his
ancestors.  All the while illegal but definitely the humane thing to do.
Riggs and his girlfriend Lorna (Rene Russo) are expecting a baby any day
now, as is Murtaugh's daughter who is married to a cop (Chris Rock), a
man who works with Riggs and Murtaugh and a man Murtaugh doesn't know is
married to his daughter because she was afraid to tell him since he was
always against her marrying a cop.  Murtaugh later finds out about his
new son-in-law while getting high on some dentist's laughing gas and the
humour is what has always saved these movies from falling into the
abyss.
This movie certainly stays within the tradition of slick action movies
with the key emphasis being on the word "slick".  The slickest and best
installment of all the 'Lethal Weapon' movies is #2 which had the most
bruising story and climax of all.  It also introduced us to Joe Pesci as
Leo Getz who became the comic relief of the series and although his
character was badly used in #3, he is better this time around.
Director Richard Donner keeps the movie alive with well photographed and
edited scenes of action and ranks as one of the action genre's most
talented contributors.  I'll probably put 'Lethal Weapon 4' in my video
collection for the sake of uniting it with other members of its family
but I'll probably watch it the least as it is the least of all the
'Lethal Weapon' movies, without hesitation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Author
James Brundage
Story by Jonathan Lemkin, Alfred Gough, and Miles Millar
Starring Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, Joe Pesci, Chris Rock, and Jet
Li
The equation for the number of new major players in the Lethal Weapon series
is simple.  Take the number that the movie is in the series and add one. 
Hence, Lethal Weapon has two cast members, Lethal Weapon 2 has three, Lethal
Weapon 3 has four, and Lethal Weapon 4 has five.  This time out, the new
addition is that of Chris Rock, who functions as a much less annoying Joe
Pesci and is able to slip easily into the idea of a buddy action-comedy,
despite having never gone into that uncharted territory.
Sure, he's a comedian, and comedians don't normally make a one-time switch to
a buddy-action comedy (in the case of people like Martin Lawrence, it's more
of a permanent move), but the Lethal Weapon series has always been far from
typical.  It practically spawned the buddy action-comedy back in 1987 with its
first outing and has been redefining the genre of its own creation ever
since.
Lethal Weapon 4, like all of the other Lethal Weapon films, is timely.  This
one concerns illegal immigration from China, something that has drastically
increased since Hong Kong was handed over in 1997.  The fall of Hong Kong also
comes into play, but I opt not to give away what little bit of mystery there
is to the plot.  Also in the mix is the fact that Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson) is
facing the prospect of parenthood along with IAD Sergeant Lorna Cole (Rene
Russo).  And, compounding the multiple family problems that Roger Murtaugh
(Danny Glover) already has, his daughter Rianne is going to be a mother but
who's the father?
The characters, already developed over the past 14 years of the saga,
continue to grow and expand in the fourth (and perhaps final) installment. 
Herein lies the separating aspect of the series: as we all know, action movies
are really supposed to have either plot or characters.  Yet, in Lethal Weapon
4 (and all of the other Lethal Weapon films), not only do we have characters
that we know and like, but we have a continuing and ever-expanding dynamic. 
We have a sharply written script.  We have a tightly directed film.  In short,
we have everything we don't expect.
For those who target Lethal Weapon 4 as being formulaic, remember that in
fact they invented the formula.  They are working with, and altering, their
own creation as they go.  As proof of this I offer the dozens of great lines
that pop up throughout the film, each of which would qualify as bad dialogue
did we not know the characters so well as to have their ability to think up
good responses and joke under pressure down to an art.  Also, the standard of
most action movies (grabber sequence, plot development, action sequence,
repeat) was started with Lethal Weapon yet is not always utilized by it. 
Lethal Weapon 4 often blends plot development and action sequences together,
or separates them so little as to never allow the viewer to get bored.
Going with my formula of a positive review, I begin the problems paragraph
with my constant: As always, I have my gripes.  The acting is as bad as it
ever was.  Gibson may be furnished with a great character to work with, but
that does nothing for his thespian abilities.  Chris Rock isn't quite as funny
as he always has been, and this falls to the fault of the writers who tried to
inhibit his native comic genius by making him do the standard bits (i.e. the
"They screw you with" bit that appears in every movie from Lethal Weapon 2
on).  Joe Pesci continues being Joe Pesci an annoying person.  Whether this
is intended or not, it gets on the viewers nerves.
My final complaint comes in the form of the message that it tries to insert. 
I do like my action movies timely, but I don't like them to be political. 
With its overwhelming message about the importance of family, Lethal Weapon 4
serves to waste about twenty minutes of screen time.
Were those twenty minutes cut, we would have had a really great action film
on our hands.  As it is, we have to settle for a pretty good action film.


Author
Michael Dequina
Lethal Weapon 4 (R) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
>From the moment its rush production was announced, media and industry
pundits immediately pegged _Lethal_Weapon_4_ as a disaster waiting to
happen.  What these naysayers had forgotten was that the _Lethal_ series is
not one of the most successful action franchises in film history for
nothing, delivering all the requisite slam-bang thrills with appealing
actors and a generous dose of humor.  The _Lethal_s have a set formula, to
be certain, but even in this fourth go-round, the magic and charm is
definitely still there.
One of the reasons some had doubts about _Lethal_4_ is a bloated cast,
which had sunk last year's fourth entry in another successful Warner Bros.
franchise, the _Batman_ series.  And though the ongoing cast additions that
have characterized the _Lethal_ series have proven successful in previous
installments, on paper, it appeared that the core had reached critical mass
in _Lethal_4_.  The original's odd couple cop duo of wild and wacky Martin
Riggs (Mel Gibson) and straightlaced family man Roger Murtaugh (Danny
Glover) successfully became a trio with the addition of motormouthed money
launderer Leo Getz (Joe Pesci) in _Lethal_2_; that three made an improbably
seamless transition to four with _Lethal_3_'s introduction of daredevil
Internal Affairs officer Lorna Cole (Rene Russo), the female "lethal
weapon."  To bring the core ensemble to five is a highly
risky and impractical proposition, but screenwriter Channing Gibson
(working from a story by Jonathan Lemkin, Alfred Gough, and Miles Millar)
and series director Richard Donner decided to add wet-behind-the-ears cop
Lee Butters (Chris Rock) into the mix.  Initially, the strain of
accommodating a large ensemble shows.  After an entertaining
curtain-raising action scene involving Riggs and Murtaugh's encounter with
a flamethrower-wielding maniac comes the lengthy
introductions/reintroductions of the rest of the cast: not only Leo, Lorna,
and Butters, but also those who have lingered in the background throughout
the entire series: police captain Ed Murphy (Steve Kahan), police
psychologist Stephanie Woods (Mary Ellen Trainor), Murtaugh's wife Trish
(Darlene Love), their daughters Rianne (Traci Wolfe) and Carrie (Ebonie
Smith), and son Nick (Damon Hines).
However, what could have easily become tedious for fans of the series and
even newcomers is made enjoyable by what has become one of the _Lethal_
series' trademarks: humor (it is ironic that the rather dark Shane
Black-penned original, in which Riggs was despondent and suicidal,
gradually evolved into an action comedy series).  The seemingly misguided
addition of Butters also proves to be a fairly effective one.  Known to
everyone except Murtaugh, Butters is the father of Rianne's unborn child
_and_ her secret husband, which creates some predictable but no less funny
comedy of misunderstanding (Murtaugh interprets Butters's attention and
devotion to be something a bit deeper).  Butters's most notable
contribution, though, is serving as a formidable F-word-sparring partner
for Leo, whose new occupation as a private investigator (!) more
comfortably works him into the story than his real estate agent status in
_Lethal_3_.
So what exactly _is_ the story?  After our intrepid detective duo,
both now promoted to the rank of captain (a plot thread that doesn't
particularly lead anywhere), along with Leo, stumble upon a shipload of
illegal Chinese immigrants, they find out about a dastardly plan
orchestrated by an Asian Triad leader (Hong Kong action legend Jet Li,
making his American debut).  That's pretty much it, but the lack of story
is more than compensated by the presence of a terrific villain, the absence
of which was _Lethal 3_'s biggest problem.  Though his work here isn't
quite at the level as that of his Hong Kong works such as the
_Once_Upon_a_Time_in_China_ series, Li's high-flying martial arts
(choreographed by, among others, HK film director Corey Yuen) displays are
simply astounding, and he pulls of the none-too-easy task of stealing the
show; if
Li's ecstatic crowd reaction at the preview screening is any indication, he
will become an immediate audience favorite, paving the way for a bright
Hollywood future.
With such a large cast, someone is bound to get short shrift, and the
victim here, unfortunately, is Russo.  Lorna was by far _Lethal_3_'s most
inspired element, a Riggs love interest that was every bit his equal.  This
time around, however, Lorna is just about cleansed of the machisma that
made her so popular.  In a simply dumb move, the writing crew knocked her
up with Riggs's child, thus removing her from nearly all of the action.
Although she is given one (way too brief) fight scene, in effect she is
made into what Patsy Kensit played in _Lethal_2_--a token "girl" for Riggs.
 Lorna is never more sorely missed than in the climax; although Butters is
an amusing character, he doesn't click nearly as well as the third partner
because he doesn't quite hold his own in the action scenes.
Despite its flaws, what sells _Lethal_Weapon_4_ is the action, and
between a spectacular midfilm freeway chase to Li's amazing acrobatics, it
is definitely the thrill ride to beat this summer.  The film closes with a
photo album montage of cast and crew photos culled from all four _Lethal_s,
almost as if to close the book on the series.  But if Donner and company
can keep the _Lethal_ films as fun as all four have been, then there will
be plenty more images to add to the album in the future.  As the film's
final line goes, "We're family," and after four wildly exciting
entertainments, audiences will feel (if they don't already)
the same way about these characters and will want to return to them in the
years to come.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Alex Fung
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The venerable LETHAL WEAPON franchise continues its frightful
   tailspin in this tired fourth installment, a formulaic entry whose
   sole apparent purpose is to reunite its familiar cast of characters
   and recycle their old shtick -- we've got Riggs (Mel Gibson) and
   Murtaugh (Danny Glover) squabbling like an old married couple (which,
   after eleven years of onscreen partnership, they more or less are),
   Leo Getz (Joe Pesci) throwing another hissy fit, Lorna (Rene Russo)
   kicking butt (while pregnant, yet), Murtaugh's family endangered
   *yet* again, action and pyrotechnics galore .. hey, it even has Riggs
   doing his signature weirdo arm-socket popping thing!
   Terrific, but haven't we seen this all before?  In the studio's mad
   rush to get the picture in the can -- LETHAL WEAPON 4 began filming
   in January and hit theatres by July, a breakneck pace for a
   heavy-duty star-driven studio flick -- it's clear that the idea was
   to churn out cookie-cutter material by simply dusting off the
   increasingly-sanitized cops the audience has grown to love.  Their
   escapades are all framed within some lazy excuse of a plot -- an
   uninspired piece of vapidity involving Chinese Triad members
   smuggling immigrants for slave labour -- which nobody takes very
   seriously, least of all the film's wisecracking characters.  The
   filmmakers' obvious smug inference is that reassembling the cast and
   running them through the usual series of hijinx *should* be
   sufficiently entertaining.  Familiarity breeds complacency, and
   apparently contempt.
   Well, it almost comes together.  The supporting cast accumulated from
   previous films are obligingly trotted out for requisite appearances,
   legitimately adding little to the mix other than a sense of assuring
   recognition.  My hopes were pinned upon the traditional infusion of
   new blood for this entry coming in the form of outrageous comedian
   Chris Rock (and given the series' growing reliance on jokey
   sensibilities, it was inevitable that a bonafide comic would
   eventually be cast), joining the fray as brash rookie cop Lee
   Butters.  Sadly, his formidable gifts are wasted here, stifled by the
   confines of his surprisingly straight character -- other than his
   eager-to-please relationship with Murtaugh, the film gives Butters
   has no personality of his own to speak of.
   The franchise's indelible appeal, for better or worse (and it's the
   latter if you ask me -- consider its devolution from an edgy action
   thriller centered on a fearlessly suicidal cop to a resolutely
   mainstream product where everybody seems ready to break out into
   group hugs), is the good-natured sense of camaraderie in sickening
   full display here.  From its action-packed opening to its photobook
   conclusion, LETHAL WEAPON 4 is a film *about* its characters -- this
   is, after all, a picture in which an explosive firefight with an
   armoured maniac actually serves as glossy window-dressing for scenes
   of character background and development -- and it's ultimately a
   showcase for the quintessential mismatched buddy team of Riggs and
   Murtaugh, trading quips as they bicker their way through the motions
   of cracking the case.  By now, they've become as all-American as
   apple pie, and the polished, engaging chemistry of their actor
   counterparts remains intact, but by this stage of the game, they're
   going through the motions.
   On the plus side, the film features a few inventively staged (albeit
   logically ludicrous) action sequences and some dynamic mano-a mano
   fight scenes courtesy of Hong Kong wunderkind Jet Li, but as the
   series creatively wheezes and sputters (an obvious tip-off: resorting
   to the use of a Cute Young Kid -- a typical death-knell), my
   idealistic side hopes that the filmmakers have the good sense to
   gracefully mothball the franchise after this picture.  My cynical,
   anything-for-a-buck side, on the other hand...
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: July 10, 1998
Starring: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock,
Jet Li, Steve Kahan, Kim Chan
Directed by: Richard Donner
Distributed by: Warner Brothers
MPAA Rating: R (violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/lethal.htm
For the second time this summer - in just as many weeks - Hollywood has
proven to audiences everywhere that action-adventure is the best genre
for exploiting formula to get box office dollars. Although in most
respects, the world 'formula' is used by critics to sink new releases -
hence garnering its bad connotation - it is applied with better spirits
to the latest installment of the LETHAL WEAPON series. Helmed by Richard
Donner, who has worked with Mel Gibson in two of his last three pictures
and has directed the other three Lethal pics, number four combines an
exciting mix of explosive action and comedic dialogue for a sure-fire
success of a motion picture. 
Back for LETHAL 4 are Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, and Joe Pesci;
they're joined this time by comedian Chris Rock in one of his biggest
and best performances yet. Gibson and Glover are the real stars, though,
reprising their roles as Riggs and Murtaugh to chase down some Chinese
counterfeiters. After discovering some Chinese illegal aliens aboard a
boat in the Los Angeles harbor, they track them to a sweatshop where the
immigrants work to create bogus cash. The story in the Channing Gibson
script, however, almost plays second fiddle to the intense rush of
pyrotechnics that is heavily dispersed throughout the movie. Equally
present is the vulgar language, although it doesn't make the movie any
less enjoyable and is rarely outstanding. 
It could be said that Director Donner stretches the limits of reality
when providing the action content in LETHAL WEAPON 4, for there's no
limit to the amount or convenience of the items that the story will have
blown up. For instance: in the opening scene, Riggs and Murtaugh take on
a crazy in a bulletproof suit, armed with an assault rifle and a napalm
gun. Of course, there's a napalm tank on his back, and his chosen ground
for the standoff is a gas station with an oil truck parked outside.
Guess what happens to the bad guy, the oil truck, and the gas station?
Or in another scene: Riggs and his girlfriend Lorna (Russo) are trapped
at a train crossing by some thugs in a Suburban. Just in time, Riggs
pulls out of the way of the oncoming train so that it hits the Suburban;
and moments later, another train comes bearing down to hit the other
side of the Suburban. 
There are these examples and many more, but the bottom line is that
Donner gets the stuff to blow up really well. Following on the heels of
the noise-laden, fire-filled ARMAGEDDON, action fans will surely be
pleased by LETHAL 4. It sticks to its guns and nimbly mixes humor
(thanks, in no small part, to the thinly disguised standup routine of
Chris Rock) with action. It's been quite some time since a movie has
been able to truly recreate the exciting eye candy style of action
perfected by DIE HARD ten years ago, and LETHAL WEAPON 4 does just that.
Of the many films that have been or will be released between Memorial
Day and the end of July, this one will surely be among the most
memorable.
FINAL AWARD FOR "LETHAL WEAPON 4": 3.0 stars - a good movie.
